Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-154.02
Employable recipient; community service; costs; paid by county.

The cost of transportation of participants to community service projects, supervision, and necessary equipment shall be paid by the county.

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 6.